Hawaii statutes.
[PART XL.]
MORTALITY REVIEW OF DEATHS OF PERSONS WITH DEVELOPMENTAL OR INTELLECTUAL
DISABILITIES

[§321-501] Multidisciplinary and
multiagency mortality reviews. The department may conduct
multidisciplinary and multiagency mortality reviews of deaths of persons with
developmental or intellectual disabilities in order to reduce the incidence of
preventable deaths to persons with developmental or intellectual disabilities.
[L 2012, c 162, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next